Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1041
Internet protocol-enabled service, defined.

Internet protocol-enabled service means any service, capability, functionality, or application provided using Internet protocol, or any successor protocol, that enables a service user to send or receive a communication in Internet protocol format including, but not limited to, voice, data, or video.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 12;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1012;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 23.